Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6905
Base-year employee, defined.

Base-year employee means any individual who was employed in Nebraska and subject to the Nebraska income tax on compensation received from the taxpayer or its predecessors during the base year and who is employed at the qualified location.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 5.